Colorado, session 2026A, HB1192.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-7.8-102, amend the
introductory portion; and repeal (1.5) as follows:
26-7.8-102. Definitions.
As used in this article ARTICLE 7.8, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1.5) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
department of local affairs.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-7.8-103, amend
(1.5) as follows:
26-7.8-103. Homeless prevention activities program - criteria.
(1.5) The DIVISION SHALL ADMINISTER THE program established by
this article shall be administered by the division with recommendations
from an advisory committee which is hereby created. The advisory
committee shall be composed of at least three members selected by the
executive director. One member shall be a representative of the department
of human services, and two members shall be representatives from the
public at large. The committee shall serve without compensation and shall
not be entitled to reimbursement for their expenses while attending
meetings of the committee. The division shall administer the program under
the direction of the advisory committee ARTICLE 7.8.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-7.8-104, amend (3)
and (4) as follows:
26-7.8-104. Homeless prevention activities program - contracts
with nongovernmental agency - program standards.
(3) The advisory committee shall direct the division to SHALL
establish and enforce standards for all homeless prevention activities
programs established pursuant to this article ARTICLE 7.8.
(4) The advisory committee DIVISION shall establish standards
governing this program which assure that the funds collected pursuant to
section 39-22-1301, C.R.S., are allocated to nongovernmental agencies,
either directly or through the coordination and oversight of units of local
government, for use for direct client services and assistance.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1192

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1192